New Mexico, session 2026, HB55.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. A new section of the Income Tax Act is enacted to read: "[NEW MATERIAL] DEDUCTION--FIRST RESPONDER RETIREMENT INCOME.-- A. A taxpayer who is a first responder retiree or the unmarried surviving spouse of a first responder retiree may claim a deduction in an amount equal to fifty percent of the taxpayer's retirement pay earned for service as a first responder includable in net income. B. To claim a deduction pursuant to this section, a taxpayer shall submit to the department information required by the secretary establishing that the taxpayer is eligible to claim the deduction. C. A taxpayer allowed the deduction pursuant to this section shall report the amount of the deduction to the department in a manner required by the department. D. The deduction provided by this section shall be included in the tax expenditure budget pursuant to Section 7-1-84 NMSA 1978, including the annual aggregate cost of the deduction. E. As used in this section, "first responder" means a law enforcement officer, a firefighter or emergency medical services personnel whose duties include responding rapidly to an emergency." SECTION 2. APPLICABILITY.--The provisions of this act apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026. - 2 -